Utah statutes.
41-6a-203.   Attempt, conspiracy, or other violations of chapter.

(1) A person who commits, attempts to commit, conspires to commit, or aids or abets in the commission of an act that is a crime under this chapter, whether individually or in connection with one or more other persons or as a principal, agent, or accessory, is guilty of the offense.

(2)  A person who falsely, fraudulently, forcibly, or willfully induces, causes, coerces, requires, permits, or directs another to violate a provision of this chapter is guilty of the offense.

